Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.770

Records concerning accuracy and currency of voters lists.

The secretary of state and each county auditor shall maintain for at least two years and shall make available for public inspection and copying all records concerning the implementation of programs and activities conducted for the purpose of insuring the accuracy and currency of official lists of eligible voters. These records must include lists of the names and addresses of all persons to whom notices are sent and information concerning whether or not each person has responded to the notices. These records must contain lists of all persons removed from the list of eligible voters and the reasons why the voters were removed. Disclosure of information on individuals under the age of 18 is subject to RCW 29A.08.725.

[ 2023 c 361 s 10; 2018 c 109 s 19; 2004 c 267 s 135; 2003 c 111 s 252. Prior: 1994 c 57 s 7. Formerly RCW 29.04.240.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2018 c 109: See notes following RCW 29A.08.170.

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.